Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 23 Equipment and Accessories Generally

31-23-1.
Driving of unsafe vehicle — Disobedience of requirements — Inspections of motor carriers — Fines.

It is a civil violation for any person to drive or move, or for the owner, employer or employee to cause or knowingly permit to be driven or moved, on any highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles which is in such an unsafe condition as to endanger any person, or which does not contain those parts or is not at all times equipped with lamps and other equipment in proper condition and adjustment as required in this chapter or chapter 24 of this title, or for any person to do any act forbidden or fail to perform any act required under these chapters.

For the purpose of reducing the number and severity of accidents, all commercial motor vehicles must meet applicable standards set forth in this chapter and chapter 24 of this title and in the federal motor carrier safety regulations (FMCSR) contained in 49 CFR Parts 387 and 390-399, and the Hazardous Materials Regulations in 49 CFR Parts 107 (subparts F and G only), 171-173, 177, 178 and 180, as amended except as may be determined by the administrator to be inapplicable to a state enforcement program, as amended and adopted by the U.S. Department of Transportation (U.S. DOT), Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration, as may be amended from time to time. Part 391.11(b)(1) of FMCSR, 49 CFR 391.11(b)(1) shall not apply to intrastate drivers of commercial motor vehicles except for drivers of school buses and vehicles placarded under 49 CFR Part 172, Subpart F. Rules and Regulations shall be promulgated by the director of the department of revenue for the administration and enforcement of motor carrier safety. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated to ensure uniformity in motor carrier safety enforcement activities and to increase the likelihood that safety defects, driver deficiencies, and unsafe carrier practices will be detected and corrected.

Any carrier convicted of violating the rules and regulations established pursuant to this subsection shall be fined as provided in §

31-41.1-4

for each offense.

For the purposes of this section, “carrier” is defined as any company or person who furthers their commercial or private enterprise by use of a vehicle that has a gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) of ten thousand and one (10,001) or more pounds, or that transports hazardous material.

Authorized examiners, investigators, officers, or regulatory inspectors from the department of revenue with proper identification issued by the director of the department of revenue, the state police, and local law enforcement officials with proper identification certifying they are qualified motor carrier enforcement personnel trained according to subsection (f) of this section, shall have a right of entry and authority to examine all equipment of motor carriers and lessors and enter upon and perform inspections of motor carrier vehicles in operation. They shall have authority to inspect, examine, and copy all accounts, books, records, memoranda, correspondence and other documents of the motor carriers and or lessors and the documents, accounts, books, records, correspondence, and memoranda of any person controlling, controlled by, or under common control of any carrier which relate to the enforcement of this chapter.

Authorized examiners, investigators, officers, or regulatory inspectors from the state police, local law enforcement officials or the department of revenue shall declare “out of service” any motor vehicle which, by reason of its mechanical condition or loading, is so imminently hazardous to operate as to be likely to cause an accident or a breakdown. An “out of service vehicle” sticker shall be used to mark vehicles out of service. The “out of service vehicle” sticker shall be affixed to the driver’s window on power units placed out of service and, affixed to the left front corner of trailers or semi-trailers placed out of service.

No person shall remove the “out of service vehicle” sticker from any motor vehicle prior to completion of all repairs required by the “out of service” notice.

Any motor vehicle discovered to be in an unsafe condition while being operated on the highway may be continued in operation only to the nearest place where repairs can be safely effected.

Operation in an unsafe condition will be conducted only if it is less hazardous to the public than to permit the vehicle to remain on the highway.

A motor carrier shall not require or permit a person to operate a motor vehicle declared out of service until all the repairs required by the out of service notice are satisfactorily completed.

Any person convicted of unauthorized removal or causing to be removed an “out of service vehicle” sticker shall be fined as provided in §

31-41.1-4

.

Any person convicted of operating or causing to operate an “out of service vehicle” on a public highway shall be fined as provided in §

31-41.1-4

.

In order to enforce the provisions of this section, authorized examiners, investigators, officers, or regulatory inspectors must satisfactorily complete a course of instruction as prescribed by the U.S. Department of Transportation (U.S. DOT), Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration in the federal motor carrier safety regulations (FMCSR) safety inspection procedures, and out of service criteria with at least annual in-service training covering the prescribed instruction.

Violations of the provisions of this section shall be recorded in the commercial vehicle inspection report approved by the U.S. Department of Transportation (U.S. DOT), Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration in addition to the appropriate Rhode Island state uniform summons.

Any fine imposed as a result of a violation of this section shall not be subject to any additional assessments imposed pursuant to any other laws of the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-1

; P.L. 1985, ch. 503, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 11; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 77, § 5; P.L. 2005, ch. 82, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 19; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 10; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 19.

31-23-2.
Additional parts and accessories.

Nothing contained in this chapter or chapter 24 of this title shall be construed to prohibit the use of additional parts and accessories on any vehicle not inconsistent with the provisions of these chapters.

No person shall install or adjust any equipment, part, or accessory on a motor vehicle that is intended for use on any highway, which would result in the motor vehicle or its operation being inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter or chapter 24 of this title and could result in the issuance of a notice pursuant to §

31-38-2

. The penalty for the first violation of the provisions of the subsection shall be a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), for the second violation a fine of five hundred dollars ($500), and for the third and subsequent violations a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-2

; P.L. 2008, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 311, § 1.

31-23-3.
Farm and road machinery exempt.

The provisions of this chapter and chapter 24 of this title with respect to equipment on vehicles shall not apply to farm vehicles, road machinery, road rollers, or farm tractors except as made applicable in these chapters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-3

.

31-23-4.
Brake equipment required.

Every motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, when operated upon a highway, shall be equipped with brakes adequate to control the movement of and to stop and hold the vehicle, including two (2) separate means of applying the brakes, each of which means shall be effective to apply the brakes to at least two (2) wheels. If these two separate means of applying the brakes are connected in any way, they shall be so constructed that failure of any one part of the operating mechanism shall not leave the motor vehicle without brakes on at least two (2) wheels.

Every motorcycle, and motor-driven cycle, when operated upon a highway shall be equipped with at least one brake, which may be operated by hand or foot, and which is adequate to control and stop the vehicle.

Every trailer or semi-trailer of a gross weight of four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.) or more, when operated upon a highway, shall be equipped with brakes adequate to control the movement of and to stop and to hold the vehicle, and so designed as to be applied by the driver of the towing motor vehicle from the driver’s normal operating position, and the brakes shall be so designed and connected that in case of an accidental breakaway of the towed vehicle, the brakes shall be automatically applied.

Every new motor vehicle, trailer or semi-trailer sold in this state and operated upon the highways shall be equipped with service brakes upon all wheels of the vehicle, except any motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, and except that any semi-trailer of less than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.) gross weight need not be equipped with brakes.

In any combination of motor-drawn vehicles, means shall be provided for applying:

The rearmost trailer brakes, of any trailer equipped with brakes, in approximate synchronism with the brakes on the towing vehicle and developing the required braking effort on the rearmost wheels at the fastest rate; or

Braking effort first on the rearmost trailer equipped with brakes; or

Both of the above means capable of being used alternatively may be employed.

Every motor vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer, and pole trailer, and any combination of those vehicles, except motorcycles and motor-driven cycles, shall be equipped with parking brakes adequate to hold the vehicle on any grade on which it is operated under all conditions of loading on a surface free from snow, ice, or loose material. The parking brakes shall be capable of being applied in conformance with the requirements in this subsection by the driver’s muscular effort, by spring action, or by equivalent means. The operation may be assisted by the service brakes or other source of power, provided that failure of the service brake actuation system or other power assisting mechanism will not prevent the parking brakes from being applied in conformance with the requirements in this subsection. The parking brakes shall be so designed that when once applied they shall remain applied with the required effectiveness, despite exhaustion of any source of energy or leakage of any kind. The same brake drums, brake shoes and lining assemblies, brake shoe anchors, and mechanical brake shoe actuation mechanism normally associated with the wheel brake assemblies may be used for both the service brakes and the parking brakes. If the means of applying the parking brakes and the service brakes are connected in any way, they shall be so constructed that failure of any one part shall not leave the vehicle without operative brakes.

The brake shoes operating within or upon the drums on the vehicle wheels of any motor vehicle may be used for both service and hand operation.

It shall be unlawful to sell, offer for sale, or distribute brake linings for use on motor vehicles, unless they are of a type and meet specifications promulgated by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and empowered to adopt and amend regulations governing types and promulgate specifications of brake linings which comply with approved standards, as promulgated by the vehicle equipment safety commission, and shall establish and maintain an approved list of brake linings meeting the specifications as established in this chapter. Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a civil violation and is subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 30; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-4

; P.L. 1965, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 26, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 11; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 68; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-5.
Performance ability of brakes.

Every motor vehicle or combination of motor-drawn vehicles shall be capable at all times, and under all conditions of loading, of being stopped on a dry, smooth, level road free from loose material, upon application of the service (foot) brake within the distances specified below, or shall be capable of being decelerated at a sustained rate corresponding to these distances:

Feet to stop Deceleration from 20 miles in feet per per hour second per second Vehicles or combination of vehicles having brakes on all wheels 30 14 Vehicles or combinations of vehicles not having brakes on all wheels 40 10.7

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, ch. 34, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-5

.

31-23-6.
Maintenance of brakes.

All brakes shall be maintained in good working order and shall be so adjusted as to operate as equally as practicable with respect to the wheels on opposite sides of the vehicle. The brake fluid in hydraulic brakes shall conform to minimum S.A.E. (Society of Automotive Engineers) standards.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-6

; P.L. 1960, ch. 101, § 1.

31-23-7.
Brakes on motor-driven cycles.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized to require an inspection of the brake on any motor-driven cycle and to disapprove any brake which he or she finds will not comply with the performance ability standard set forth in §

31-23-5

, or which in his or her opinion is not designed or constructed as to insure reasonable and reliable performance in actual use.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles may refuse to register or may suspend or revoke the registration of any vehicle referred to in this section when he or she determines that the brake on it does not comply with the provisions of this section.

No person shall operate on any highway any vehicle referred to in this section in the event the administrator of the division of motor vehicles has disapproved the brake equipment upon the vehicle or type of vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-7

.

31-23-8.
Horn required.

Every motor vehicle when operated upon a highway shall be equipped with a horn in good working order and capable of emitting sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than two hundred feet (200´). However, no horn or other warning device shall emit an unreasonably loud or harsh sound or a whistle. The driver of a motor vehicle shall when reasonably necessary to insure safe operation give audible warning with his or her horn but shall not otherwise use the horn when upon a highway. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art 34, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-8

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-9.
Theft alarm signals.

It is permissible but not required that any vehicle be equipped with a theft alarm signal device which is so arranged that it cannot be used by the driver as an ordinary warning signal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-9

; P.L. 1972, ch. 25, § 1.

31-23-10.
Sirens, bells, and whistles prohibited.

No vehicle shall be equipped with nor shall any person use upon a vehicle any siren, whistle, or bell, except as permitted in §§

31-23-9

,

31-23-11

and

31-23-12

. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-10

; P.L. 1972, ch. 25, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-11.
Warning devices on emergency vehicles.

Any authorized emergency vehicle may be equipped with a siren, whistle, or bell, capable of emitting sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred feet (500´) and of a type approved by the registry. The siren shall not be used except when the vehicle is operated in response to an emergency call or in the immediate pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law, in which latter events, the driver of the vehicle shall sound the siren when reasonably necessary to warn pedestrians and other drivers of its approach.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-11

.

31-23-11.1.
Warning lights on private vehicles.

A joint committee for volunteer permits, three (3) of whom shall be appointed by the president of the Rhode Island Association of Fire Chiefs and two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the president of the Rhode Island Association of Police Chiefs, shall take responsibility for the following actions regarding warning lights on privately owned vehicles:

Develop procedures for the design, issuance, transfer and revocation of permit stickers;

Develop rules and regulations for the use of warning lights;

Develop minimum training standards for drivers;

Develop procedures to govern the board’s activities.

The fire chief or commander of a municipal or non-profit fire, rescue, or ambulance department shall take responsibility for the following actions regarding warning lights on privately owned vehicles:

Make application for permits to joint committee on volunteer permits;

Maintain a listing of vehicle registrations and vehicle identification numbers for which warning lights are issued;

Ensure that permits are removed from vehicles upon transfer of ownership;

Post in a conspicuous place at all times, standard operating guidelines for the proper use of warning lights.

The chief or commander of any fire, rescue, or ambulance department shall limit the use of warning lights to chief officers, deputy chiefs, assistant chiefs, captains, or other members deemed necessary and appropriate by written justification to the joint committee on volunteer permits.

The fire, rescue, or ambulance department must own any warning lights issued by the fire chief or commander of the department.

Each authorized volunteer member of a fire, rescue, or ambulance department must affix a permit sticker on any vehicle utilizing warning lights in accordance with rules and regulations developed by the joint committee on volunteer permits. Authorized members shall only utilize these warning lights within their department jurisdiction as the members respond to an emergency or to provide protection while parked at the scene of an emergency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 447, § 2.

31-23-12.
Salvation Army vehicle.

The motor vehicle equipment (station wagon) of the Salvation Army, with headquarters located in Providence, Rhode Island, is declared to be an authorized emergency vehicle and may be equipped with a siren, whistle, or bell as provided in §

31-23-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 32; P.L. 1953, ch. 3067, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-12

.

31-23-13.
Muffler.

Every motor vehicle shall at all times be equipped with a muffler in good working order and in constant operation to prevent excessive or unusual noise and annoying smoke. No person shall use a muffler cutout, bypass, or similar device upon a motor vehicle on a highway. Any exhaust system shall be deemed defective if any changes, modifications, alterations, deletions, or adjustments have been made which would cause the exhaust system to generate a higher or louder sound level than would be generated by the exhaust system customarily installed by the manufacturer as original equipment. The defective exhaust system shall be replaced or repaired to restore the exhaust system to the performance specifications of the original equipment. Failure to replace or restore the exhaust system as required in this section within five (5) days shall be deemed a civil violation and violators are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-13

; P.L. 1967, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 11; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-13.1.
Altering height of or operating a motor vehicle with an altered height prohibited.

No person shall alter the height of or operate a motor vehicle with an altered height that has an original manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of up to and including ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.), by elevating or lowering the chassis or body by more than four inches (4") from the original manufacturers’ specified height by use of so called “shackle lift kits” for leaf springs or by use of lift kits for coil springs, tires, or any other means or device. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall establish rules and regulations for motor vehicle heights including exceptions for vehicles used for farming or forestry. No motor vehicle that has been so altered, modified, or changed beyond the provisions of this section or the rules and regulations established by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, shall be operated on any highway. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 541, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-14.
Prevention of excessive fumes or smoke.

The engine and power mechanism of every motor vehicle shall be so equipped and adjusted as to prevent the escape of excessive fumes or smoke. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-14

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-14.1.
Fire extinguishers.

Every truck operated, owned, or leased by the state of Rhode Island or a political subdivision of the state shall be equipped with a fire extinguisher. The fire extinguisher shall contain a potassium bicarbonate base dry chemical fire extinguishing agent having an underwriter’s laboratory rating of six (6) B:C, and a capacity of not less than two and one-half pounds (21/2 lbs.).

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 65, § 1.

31-23-15.
Rear-view mirror.

Every motor vehicle which is so constructed or loaded as to obstruct the driver’s view to the rear of it from the driver’s position shall be equipped with a mirror so located as to reflect to the driver a view of the highway for a distance of at least two hundred feet (200´) to the rear of the vehicle.

Every motor vehicle, the primary function of which is the carrying of passengers, shall be equipped with a rear-view mirror on the left front door or fender, so located as to reflect a view of the highway for at least two hundred feet (200´) to the rear of the vehicle.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-15

; P.L. 1967, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-16.
Windshield and window stickers — Obstructions to clear view — Snow and ice on vehicle.

No person shall drive any motor vehicle with any sign, poster, or other nontransparent material, or dirt, snow, or ice upon the front windshield, side wings, or side or rear windows of the vehicle which obstructs the driver’s clear view of the highway or any intersecting highway; provided, that the administrator of the division of motor vehicles may permit the placing of special stickers upon the windshield or any of the windows of a motor vehicle in the manner specified by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

No person shall drive any motor vehicle with any significant amounts of snow or ice upon the vehicle. The term “significant” is construed as any amount of accumulation which might reasonably be expected, when blowing off the vehicle while driving, to obscure the vision of an operator of another vehicle. However, the natural accumulation of snow while driving during adverse weather conditions shall not constitute a violation of this section. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 35; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-16

; P.L. 1983, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 415, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-17.
Windshield wipers.

The windshield on every motor vehicle shall be equipped with a device for cleaning rain, snow, or other moisture from the windshield, which device shall be so constructed as to be controlled or operated by the driver of the vehicle.

Every windshield wiper upon a motor vehicle shall be maintained in good working order.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 35; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-17

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-18.
Solid rubber tires.

Every solid rubber tire on a vehicle shall have rubber on its entire traction surface at least one inch thick above the edge of the flange of the entire periphery.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-18

.

31-23-19.
Metal tires prohibited.

No person shall operate or move on any highway any motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer having any metal tire in contact with the roadway. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-19

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-20.
Protuberances on tires.

No tires on a vehicle moved on a highway shall have on its periphery any block, flange, cleat, or pointed spike or other protuberance of any material other than rubber which projects beyond the tread of the traction surface of the tire except that:

It shall be permissible to use tires with flat-headed studs projecting one-sixteenth inch (1/16") or less beyond the tread of the traction surface from the fifteenth day of November to the first day of April;

It shall be permissible to use farm machinery with tires having protuberances which will not injure the highway; and

It shall be permissible to use tire chains of reasonable proportions upon any vehicle when required for safety because of snow, ice, or other conditions tending to cause a vehicle to skid.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-20

; P.L. 1965, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-21.
Permits for operation of vehicles having tracks with transverse corrugations.

The department of revenue and local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may in their discretion issue special permits authorizing the operation upon a highway of traction engines or tractors having movable tracks with transverse corrugations upon the periphery of the movable tracks or farm tractors or other farm machinery, the operation of which upon a highway would otherwise be prohibited under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 36; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-21

; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 19; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 19.

31-23-22.
Safety glass in new vehicles.

No person shall sell any new motor vehicle as specified in this section, nor shall any new motor vehicle as specified in this section be registered, unless the vehicle is equipped with safety glass of a type approved by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles wherever glass is used in doors, windows, and windshields.

The provisions of this section shall apply to all passenger type motor vehicles, including passenger buses and school buses, but in respect to trucks, including truck tractors, the requirements as to safety glass shall apply to all glass used in doors, windows, and windshields in the drivers’ compartments of those vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-22

.

31-23-23.
Replacement with safety glass.

No person shall replace any glass on any motor vehicle at a place where safety glass is required unless the replacement is made with safety glass approved by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-23

.

31-23-24.
“Safety glass” defined.

“Safety glass” means any product composed of glass manufactured, fabricated, or treated as substantially to prevent shattering and flying of the glass when struck or broken, or any other or similar product that may be approved by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-24

.

31-23-25.
List of approved types of glass — Enforcement of requirements.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall compile and publish a list of types of glass by name approved by him or her as meeting the requirements of §§

31-23-22

—

31-23-24

. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall not register any motor vehicle which is subject to the provisions of this chapter unless it is equipped with an approved type of safety glass, and he or she shall subsequently suspend the registration of any motor vehicle subject to this chapter which he or she finds is not so equipped until it is made to conform to the requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-25

.

31-23-26.
Fenders and wheel flaps required.

No person shall operate any motor vehicle on any public highway of this state unless the vehicle is equipped with fenders covering the front wheels of the motor vehicle, or operate any passenger motor vehicle on any public highway equipped with tires which extend beyond the fenders or body of the vehicle unless it is also equipped with flaps or suitable guards to reduce spray or splash to the rear and sides. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 41; P.L. 1955, ch. 3539, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-26

; P.L. 1973, ch. 265, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-27.
Rear wheel flaps on buses, trucks, and trailers.

No person shall operate or cause to be operated any bus, truck, full trailer or semi-trailer, of registered gross weight exceeding three (3) tons, on any public highway in this state unless it is equipped with suitable metal protectors or substantial flexible flaps behind the rearmost wheels. In case the rear wheels are not covered at the top and rear by fender, body, or other parts of the vehicle, the rear wheels shall be covered at the top and rear by protective means of a standard type or design and so installed as to reduce, as far as practicable, the wheels from throwing dirt, water, or other materials on the windshields of following vehicles, except in cases in which the motor vehicle is so designed and constructed that the requirements of this section are accomplished by reason of the fender or body construction or other means of enclosure. However, §§

31-23-26

—

31-23-28

shall not apply to vehicles where their construction is such that complete freedom around the wheel area is necessary to secure the designed use of the vehicle. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 41; P.L. 1955, ch. 3539, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-27

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-28.
Failure to have fenders or wheel flaps.

Any person who violates any provision of §§

31-23-26

and

31-23-27

shall be fined not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) or imprisoned not more than thirty (30) days, or both fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 41; P.L. 1955, ch. 3539, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-28

.

31-23-29.
Flares and warning devices.

No person shall operate any truck, truck/tractor or passenger bus upon any highway unless there shall be carried flares and/or warning devices for stopped and/or disabled vehicles.

These flares and/or warning devices shall conform and be displayed according to regulations set forth in 49 CFR Parts 390-399, as amended.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 361, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-30 — 31-23-36.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, §§ 38, 39; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 14; G.L. 1956, §§

31-23-30

— 31-23-36; Repealed by P.L. 1988, ch. 361, § 1, effective June 19, 1988.

31-23-37.
Transporting hazardous substances.

For the purpose of this section, “explosives and other hazardous materials” is defined as those materials and substances described and classified as such by the hazardous materials regulations of the U.S. Department of Transportation (parts of the Code of Federal Regulations as prescribed under Title 18 U.S.C. §§ 831, 836, as amended).

No person, corporation, or other agency shall ship in its own vehicle or tender to any carrier any shipment of explosives or other hazardous materials unless the shipments are made in full compliance with the regulations cited in subsection (a) of this section.

No person, corporation, or other agency shall operate upon any highway in this state a vehicle carrying explosives or other hazardous materials unless the vehicle is in compliance in all respects with the regulations applicable to the transportation of such materials or substances cited in subsection (a) of this section.

Any person, corporation, or other agency convicted of violating this section shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisoned for one year, for the first offense, and shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned for one year for each subsequent offense.

If death or injury results from any violation of this section, the fine shall be not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and the period of imprisonment not more than ten (10) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 40; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-37

; P.L. 1962, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 10, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 101, § 1.

31-23-38.
Television receivers prohibited.

No television viewer, screen, or other means of visually receiving a television broadcast shall be located in the field of view of the operator of the motor vehicle. Any person who drives or causes to be driven any motor vehicle in violation of the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

This section does not prohibit the use of an electronic display used exclusively for safety or in conjunction with a vehicle navigation system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2611, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-23-38

; P.L. 1999, ch. 293, § 1.

31-23-39.
Safety seat belts in new vehicles.

It is unlawful for any person to buy, sell, lease, trade, or transfer from or to Rhode Island residents at retail an automobile, which is manufactured or assembled commencing with the 1964 models, unless the vehicle is equipped with safety belts installed for use in the left front and right front seat.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 98, § 1.

31-23-40.
Approved types of seat belts — Enforcement of requirements.

All safety belts must be of a type and must be installed in a manner approved by the division of motor vehicles. The division of motor vehicles shall establish specifications and requirements for approved types of safety belts and attachments to them. The division of motor vehicles will accept, as approved, all seat belt installations and the belt and anchor meeting the Society of Automotive Engineers’ specifications. No new passenger motor vehicle shall be registered unless it is equipped with an approved type of safety seat belt. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall suspend the registration of any motor vehicle not so equipped until it is made to conform to the requirements of this section. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-41.
Safety belts in public service vehicles.

Every jitney, bus, private bus, school bus, and trackless trolley coach, when operated upon a highway, shall be equipped with a driver’s seat safety belt device sufficiently anchored and attached and so constructed, designed, and installed as to support a loop-load strength of not less than five thousand pounds (5,000 lbs.) and a buckle or closing device which shall be of a construction and design that it can be released with one hand with a pull of less than forty-five pounds (45 lbs.). Every person when driving any vehicle of this kind shall use and have his or her body anchored by the seat safety belt. Violation of this section shall constitute a civil violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 5; P.L. 1986, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 11.

31-23-42.
First-aid kit and heating equipment in school bus.

Every school bus as defined in §

31-1-3

shall be equipped with a first-aid kit containing those articles and appliances generally included in an approved American Red Cross first-aid kit used in the administration of first-aid treatment. Every school bus shall also be equipped with an operable system for completely and adequately heating the bus while transporting children.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 448, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 17.